Louisiana, session 2026, HB736.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1464(D) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§§1464. Rate filing
* * *
D.(1) All rates, supplementary rate information, and any supporting
information filed pursuant to this Subpart shall be open to public inspection upon
expiration of the notification period as applicable pursuant to R.S. 22:1451, or upon
disapproval, except for information that is confidential, trade secret, or proprietary.
The determination of whether such information is in fact confidential, trade secret,
or proprietary shall be made by the commissioner in accordance with the following
procedures set forth in this Subsection.
(2)(a) If the commissioner receives a request for any information which has
been marked by the insurer or filer as confidential, trade secret, or proprietary, prior
to disclosure, the commissioner shall notify the insurer or filer in writing of the
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1047 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 736
request and the commissioner's determination of whether or not the information so
requested is subject to disclosure. Any insurer claiming that documents or
information filed pursuant to the provisions of this Section contain trade secrets may
file with the commissioner a notice of request for nondisclosure on the basis of trade
secret protection. Failure to do so shall constitute a waiver of any claim that the
document or information is a trade secret.
(b) Within ten days of receipt of the notification, the insurer or filer may
request a hearing before the division of administrative law in accordance with R.S.
22:2191 et seq. In the event of a hearing request, the commissioner's determination
as to whether the information is confidential, trade secret, or proprietary shall be
stayed.
(c) Any action brought pursuant to this Paragraph shall be tried by
preference and in a summary manner. The court may review the documents in-
camera before reaching a decision.
(3) Nothing in this Subsection precludes the public examination or
reproduction of any record or part of a record which is not confidential, proprietary,
or trade secret. A claim that information is subject to non-disclosure on the grounds
that it is a trade secret shall meet all of the following conditions:
(a) It must be information, including a formula, pattern, compilation,
program, device, method, technique, or process that derives independent economic
value, actual or potential, from not being generally known to and not being readily
ascertainable by proper means or by other persons who can obtain economic value
from its disclosure or use; and is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the
circumstances to maintain its secrecy.
(b) Each page of the document or a specific portion of the document claimed
to be a trade secret shall be clearly marked as "trade secret".
(c) All material marked as a trade secret shall be separated from all non-trade
secret material and submitted in a separate envelope or document clearly marked as
"trade secret".
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1047 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 736
(d) In submitting a notice of trade secret to the commissioner, the submitting
party shall include a sworn affidavit that states the basis for the claim that the
submission qualifies as a trade secret and attest to the truth of all of the following:
(i) The affiant considers this information to be a trade secret that has value
and provides an advantage or an opportunity to obtain an advantage over those who
do not know or use it.
(ii) The affiant has taken measures to prevent the disclosure of the
information to anyone other than those who has been selected to have access for
limited purposes and the affiant continues to take such measures.
(iii) The information is not and has not been reasonably obtainable by other
persons by use of legitimate means without the affiant’s consent.
(iv) The information is not publicly available elsewhere, and the public
release of the information would cause actual, demonstrable harm to the affiant.
(e) It must include a summary prepared for the general public describing the
nature of the submission claimed to be a trade secret without disclosing the protected
details of the submission.
(4) The following shall not be considered a trade secret and shall be subject
to public disclosure:
(a) Any financial information, including data, models, or assumptions, used
in the calculation or justification for insurance rates.
(b) All transactions between an insurer and any affiliate, including but not
limited to, fees, commissions, payments, or profit-sharing agreements with managing
general agents, claims handlers, reinsurers, or third-party administrators.
(c) Office and employee compensation.
(d) Dividends paid to shareholders.
(e) Any information contained in rate filings.
(f) Any information used to support or oppose proposed legislation.
(g) The summary prepared in accordance with Paragraph (3)(e) of this
Section.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1047 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 736
(5) The commissioner shall review all claims of trade secret protection
submitted pursuant to this Section. If the commissioner determines that the
information does not meet the definition of a trade secret pursuant to this Section or
falls within the categories described in Paragraph (4) of this Subsection, the claim
shall be denied and the department shall issue a written notice of denial to the
submitting party.
(6) The commissioner shall, at least once every other year, contract with an
independent third-party entity with expertise in insurance regulation to conduct an
independent review of trade secret claims submitted pursuant to this Section. The
contract shall require submission of a final report to the commissioner, the president
of the Senate, and the speaker of the House of Representatives by February 1st
following the year in which a review is conducted identifying any trade secret claims
that the third-party entity recommends be rejected by the commissioner.
(7) Any person who knowingly asserts a false claim of trade secret
protection in order to conceal unlawful financial practices shall be subject to a fine
imposed by the Department of Insurance in an amount not to exceed twenty-five
thousand dollars per violation and suspension or revocation of any certificate of
authority or insurance license held by that person.
* * *